Massachusetts, session 194th, H2139.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general rule to the contrary, any private railroad company or its
agents, contractors, subcontractors, vendors, sub-vendors, secondary vendors or subcarriers; and
the rail and transit division of the Massachusetts department of transportation, under contract to
provide commuter rail service through the Commonwealth, shall comply with the minimum
earned sick leave standards set forth within Chapter 149, Section 148c of the General Laws.
of 1